Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 6 Deposits, Safe-Deposit Agreements, and Money Received for Transmission

7-1-350.
Notice of rules governing deposits.

A bank which has adopted rules governing deposits or withdrawal of deposits shall give notice of the rules and all changes therein to each customer whose deposits are affected by such rules, either by delivery of a copy to such customer or by posting them in a conspicuous area in the main office and in all branch offices of the bank. If such rules are stated on a signature card or other contract signed by the customer, the bank shall be deemed to have given notice of the rules for purposes of this provision even if such signature card or contract is returned to the bank.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, § 47; Code 1933, § 13-2047; Code 1933, § 41A-1601, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-351.
Minors’ deposits and safe-deposit agreements.

A bank may receive deposits from:

A minor who is at least 16 years of age; or

One or more minors jointly with one or more adults, as party to and with the same effect as a multiple-party account under Article 8 of this chapter.

A bank may use electronic means, including, but not limited to, wire and mobile application software, to provide access to and facilitate the movement of money in such deposit account.

A bank or trust company may rent a safe-deposit box or other receptacle for safe deposit of property to, and receive property for safe deposit from:

A minor who is at least 16 years of age; or

One or more minors jointly with one or more adults.

A bank or trust company may deal with a minor who is at least 16 years of age with respect to a deposit account or safe-deposit agreement covered by paragraph (1) of subsection (a) or paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of this Code section without the consent of a parent or guardian and with the same effect as though the minor were an adult. A parent or guardian shall not have any right in that capacity to interfere with any such transaction. Any action of the minor with respect to such deposit account or safe-deposit agreement shall be binding on the minor with the same effect as though the minor were an adult.

Nothing in this Code section shall be deemed to require a bank or trust company to provide deposit accounts or safe-deposit agreements authorized by this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, § 41; Code 1933, § 13-2041; Code 1933, § 41A-1602, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 730, § 4; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 9/HB 143.

7-1-352.
Deposit by agent, trustee, or other fiduciary.

Whenever any agent, administrator, executor, guardian, trustee, either express or implied, or other fiduciary, whether bona fide or mala fide, shall deposit any money in any bank to his credit as an individual, or as such agent, trustee, or other fiduciary, whether the name of the person or corporation for whom he is acting or purporting to act be given or not, such bank shall be authorized to pay the amount of such deposit, or any part thereof, upon the order of such agent, administrator, executor, guardian, trustee, or other fiduciary, signed with the name in which such deposit was entered, without being accountable in any way to the principal, cestui que trust, or other person or corporation who may be entitled to or interested in the amount so deposited.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall prevent the person or corporation claiming the beneficial interest in or to any deposit in any bank from resorting to the courts to claim such deposit, provided such action is brought and served before such deposit is paid out and in accordance with the requirements of Code Section 7-1-353.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, § 42; Code 1933, § 13-2042; Code 1933, § 41A-1605, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-353.
Adverse claims to deposits and property held in safe deposit.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section, a bank or trust company shall not be required to deny control over or access to a deposit account or property held in safe deposit (whether by the bank or trust company or in a safe-deposit box or other receptacle leased to a customer) to:

The customer in whose name the account or property is held by the bank or trust company (including one of two depositors or lessees entitled to such control or access by virtue of their contract with the bank or trust company); or

A person or group of persons who is authorized to draw on or control the account or property pursuant to a certified corporate resolution or other written arrangement with the customer currently on file with the bank or trust company.

A bank shall be entitled to act and rely upon:

A court order, distraint, levy, garnishment, or other effective legal process;

An agreement of the parties concerning an adverse claim; or

A claim of the type described in subsection (a) of this Code section accompanied by a bond or other indemnity adequate to protect the bank or trust company from loss as a consequence of recognizing an adverse claim.

Nothing in this Code section shall impair the effect of a discharge which a bank or trust company would be entitled to under Code Section 11-3-602.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-1606, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 7; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 7; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-8/HB 811.

Cross references.

Disposition of property held in safe deposit box or held for safekeeping by financial institution for which department acts as receiver, §

7-1-172

.

7-1-354.
Money received for transmission.

A bank or trust company which receives money for transmission shall give the customer a receipt setting forth:

The date of receipt of the money;

The amount of the money in dollars and cents; and

If the money is to be transmitted to a foreign country in the currency of such country, the amount of the money in such currency.

In an action by a customer against a bank or trust company for recovery of money delivered for transmission, the burden of proof of delivery of the money in accordance with the instructions of the customer shall be on the bank or trust company; but an affidavit by an agent or correspondent of the bank or trust company that the money was delivered in accordance with the customer’s instructions shall be prima-facie evidence of the delivery of the money in accordance with the customer’s instructions.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-1607, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

Cross references.

Persons, corporations, and others engaging in business of receiving cash from patrons as payment of obligations owed by such patrons to third parties, §

10-6-100

et seq.

7-1-355.
Agreements concerning safe deposits.

A bank, trust company, or savings and loan association may receive property for safe deposit and rent out receptacles and safe-deposit boxes on the terms and conditions prescribed by it; but such terms and conditions shall not bind any customer to whom the bank, trust company, or savings and loan association does not give notice thereof either by delivery of a copy or by posting in its offices where such receptacles or safe-deposit boxes are located, or who does not otherwise agree to such terms and conditions.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-1608, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1717, § 4; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-4/HB 811; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 7/HB 323.

7-1-356.
Procedures on death or incompetence of safe depositor.

Any financial institution contracting with a person for the use of a safe-deposit box or receiving property from a person for safekeeping, upon presentation of satisfactory proof of the death or legal incompetence of such person, shall permit any person named in an order granted by the probate court having jurisdiction of such person’s estate to open and examine the contents of any safe-deposit box leased by the decedent or legally incompetent person or to examine the property left by such person for safekeeping, in the presence of an officer of the financial institution. The financial institution, if so requested by such person, shall deliver:

Any writing purporting to be a will of the decedent to the probate court having jurisdiction of the decedent’s estate;

Any writing purporting to be a deed to a burial plot or to give burial instructions to the person named in such order;

Any document purporting to be an insurance policy on the life of the decedent to the beneficiary named therein;

but no other contents shall be removed pursuant to this Code section.

Within five banking days after the order of the court is presented to the financial institution, the financial institution shall permit the person named in such order to inventory the contents of any safe-deposit box leased or rented to the decedent or legally incompetent person or the property left by such person for safekeeping. The inventory shall be conducted in the presence of an officer or employee of the financial institution by the person named in such order. The inventory shall be signed by such persons, and a copy thereof shall be retained by the financial institution and may be filed with the probate court.

The financial institution shall be free from all liability with respect to any action, claim, or demand of whatever nature asserted by any heir, legatee, distributee, creditor, administrator, executor, guardian, trustee, or other fiduciary or by any person whomsoever when acting pursuant to such letters of authority.

Upon presentation of a certified copy of his letters of authority, the financial institution shall grant the personal representative access to any safe-deposit box or property in safekeeping in the sole name of a decedent or legally incompetent person to permit him to remove from such box or place of safekeeping any part or all of the property therein without liability.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 437, §§ 1-4; Code 1933, § 41A-1609, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

Cross references.

Opening of safe deposit box on authorization of fiduciary, § 53-7-5.

7-1-357.
[Reserved] Payment of deposit of deceased depositor; deposit by nursing home of moneys left in its possession upon death of resident.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 661, § 2, effective July 1, 1983.

Editor’s notes.

The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, § 48; Ga. L. 1927, p. 195, § 11; Code 1933, § 13-2048; Ga. L. 1943, p. 253, § 1; Ga. L. 1952, p. 189, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 202, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-1610, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 21; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1388, § 3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 848, § 1.

Code Section 7-1-357 was repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 661, § 2, effective July 1, 1983. For present provisions as to payment of large deposits of deceased intestate depositors, see Code Section 7-1-239.

7-1-358.
Dormant accounts.

In accordance with and subject to the limitation of such regulations as the department may prescribe, a bank may, from time to time, charge a dormant account a reasonable service charge.

History.

Code 1933, § 13-2067, enacted by Ga. L. 1966, p. 590, § 10; Code 1933, § 41A-1611, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-359.
Fee prohibited for conducting search of dormant, abandoned, or unclaimed deposit accounts; commission or finder’s fee allowed.

No person shall charge a fee or solicit any other form of compensation for the purpose of conducting a search for dormant, abandoned, or unclaimed deposit accounts or other abandoned properties whether held by a financial institution or escheated to any governmental agency. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a commission or finder’s fee not to exceed 10 percent of actual sums recovered by the owner of such accounts may be agreed to by the parties. All moneys and properties located by a person to be compensated by the payment of such a commission or finder’s fee shall be paid directly to the owner and may not be paid over to the person to receive the commission or finder’s fee whether pursuant to a duly executed power of attorney or otherwise.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-359

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1211, § 6.

7-1-360.
Third-party claims; notification of disclosure by third party to depositor; motion to quash disclosure.

No financial institution shall be required to recognize the claim of any third party to any deposit, or withhold payment of any deposit to the depositor or to his order, unless and until the financial institution is served with citation, order, or other appropriate process issuing out of a court of competent jurisdiction in connection with a suit instituted by such third party for the purpose of recovering or establishing an interest in such deposit. Neither shall any financial institution be required to disclose or produce to third parties, or permit third parties to examine any records pertaining to a deposit account, loan account, or other banking relationship except:

Where the financial institution itself is a proper or necessary party to a proceeding in a court of competent jurisdiction;

Where the records of accounts or other customer records are requested through subpoena or other administrative process issued by a state, federal, or local administrative agency having competent jurisdiction over the depositor or other customer or where such records are requested pursuant to Georgia or federal law governing civil practice or procedure in conjunction with an ongoing civil action in a Georgia state or federal court of competent jurisdiction;

Where the records of accounts or other customer records are requested in conjunction with an ongoing criminal or tax investigation of the depositor or other customer by a state or federal grand jury, taxing authority, or law enforcement agency; or

Where the records of accounts or other customer records are requested by any state or federal regulatory agency having jurisdiction over the financial institution.

Unless directed otherwise by a court of competent jurisdiction, before disclosure, production, or examination of records produced under paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section, the agency or other party seeking the disclosure or production of the records shall provide notification to the depositor or other customer of such request. Notification of the depositor or other customer under circumstances set forth in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall not be made without the consent of the requesting authority. For purposes of ascertaining whether or not proper notice has been given or whether or not the depositor or other customer may be notified, the financial institution may rely upon appropriate certification or written assurances from the requesting party and in doing so shall be relieved of any liability which might be asserted in connection with such disclosures.

Each customer or depositor to whom notice of an order, subpoena, or request for disclosure, examination, or production of records was lawfully given may, prior to the date specified therein for disclosure, examination, or production, file in the court issuing an order or subpoena for the records or in the Georgia or federal court where the civil matter is being heard or, in the absence of such a court, in the superior court of the county in which the financial institution is located a motion to quash the order, subpoena, or request or for a protective order and shall serve such motion on the party requesting disclosure and the financial institution as may be otherwise provided by law for similar motions. Failure to file and serve such motion to quash or for protection shall constitute consent for all purposes to disclosure, production, or examination made pursuant to this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-360

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1211, § 6; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 8/SB 82.